Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-351
Specially constructed vehicle, defined.

Specially constructed vehicle means a motor vehicle or trailer which was not originally constructed under a distinctive name, make, model, or type by a manufacturer of motor vehicles or trailers. Specially constructed vehicle includes kit vehicle.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 51.